Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.145

Doctor of osteopathic medicine and surgery—Discrimination prohibited.

A professional service corporation that provides health care services to the general public may not discriminate against a qualified doctor of osteopathic medicine and surgery licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, who has applied to practice with the professional service corporation, solely because that practitioner was board certified or eligible under an approved osteopathic certifying board instead of board certified or eligible respectively under an approved medical certifying board.

[ 1995 c 64 s 2.]